Maryland, session 2026, HB1041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1041*

HOUSE BILL 1041
5–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Flood hazard area” means an area of tidal or nontidal inundation resulting
from a 100–year flood event and established pursuant to the provisions of § 5–803 of this
subtitle.
(g) “100–year flood event” or “100–year flood” means a flood that has a 1% chance
of being equalled or exceeded in any given year.
Article – Health – General
14–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Alternative accreditation” means a national camping standard that is
acceptable to the Secretary as providing adequate health and safety protection for the
campers, such as the American Camping Association standards for camp programs and
services and the Boy Scouts of America standards, which includes an annual monitoring
process to verify compliance with the standard.
(d) “Certificate” means a single certificate issued by the Department to a youth
camp under this subtitle.
(o) “Youth camp” or “camp” means any day camp, residential camp, travel camp,
or trip camp that:
(1) Accommodates 7 or more campers who are unrelated to the person
operating the camp;
(2) Provides primarily recreational activities or has a substantial outdoor
recreational component;
(3) Has permanent buildings, temporary buildings, or no buildings; and
(4) Operates on:
(i) Owned private property;
(ii) Owned private facilities;
(iii) Leased private property;
(iv) Leased private facilities;

HOUSE BILL 1041 3
(v) Public property; or
(vi) Public facilities.
14–403.
(a) (1) In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this article and subject
to the provisions of Title 10 of the State Government Article, on or before October 1, 1987,
the Secretary shall adopt regulations for certifying youth camps and for issuing letters of
compliance.
(2) (i) An applicant for a certificate shall submit an application to the
Department on the form that the Secretary requires.
(ii) An application for a certificate or for a letter of compliance shall
include:
1. The name and permanent mailing address of the
applicant;
2. The proposed location of the youth camp; and
3. Any other information and fee that the Department
requires.
(iii) For a unit or agency subject to the provisions of this subtitle, the
Secretary shall require the unit or agency to complete only one application for certification
for all youth camps directed or operated by that unit or agency.
(3) (i) The Department shall be solely responsible for implementing
and enforcing the provisions of this subtitle.
(ii) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the
Secretary may impose a fee for the purpose of inspecting, monitoring, and regulating youth
camps in accordance with § 2–104 of this article.
(iii) A camp accredited or certified in accordance with the provisions
of subsection (b)(9) of this section may not be charged a fee under the provisions of this
article.
(IV) 1. IN THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, “FLOOD HAZARD AREA” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–801 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
2. THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ISSUE OR RENEW A
CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SECTION OR ACCEPT ALTERNATIVE ACCREDITATION

HOUSE BILL 1041
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF ANY STRUCTURE THAT IS OR WILL BE USED TO HOUSE A
CAMPER IS LOCATED WITHIN A FLOOD HAZARD AREA.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.